test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.ana.yaml
  Noun - olbmojuolgi: # FALIS SgGenCmp + AIGI
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: olbmojuolgi
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: olbmojuolggit
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: olbmojuolgái
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmojuolggáš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmojuolggážaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: olbmojuolggeheapme
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: olbmojuolggálaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: olbmo-juolgi
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: olbmo-juolggit
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: olbmo-juolgái
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmo-juolggáš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmo-juolggážaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: olbmo-juolggeheapme
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: olbmo-juolggálaš

  Noun - olbmuidjuolgi: # FALIS PlGenCmp + AIGI
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: olbmuidjuolgi
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: olbmuidjuolggit
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: olbmuidjuolgái
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmuidjuolggáš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmuidjuolggážaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: olbmuidjuolggeheapme
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: olbmuidjuolggálaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: olbmuid-juolgi
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: olbmuid-juolggit
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: olbmuid-juolgái
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmuid-juolggáš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: olbmuid-juolggážaš
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: olbmuid-juolggeheapme
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: olbmuid-juolggálaš

  Noun - muitomuittašeapmi: # AIGI SgNomCmp +  EAPMI
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: muitomuittašeapmi
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muitomuittašeames, muitomuittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: muitomuittašeapmái
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: muito-muittašeapmi
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muito-muittašeames, muito-muittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: muito-muittašeapmái
    
  Noun - muittomuittašeapmi: # AIGI SgGenCmp +  EAPMI
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: muittomuittašeapmi
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muittomuittašeames, muittomuittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: muittomuittašeapmái
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: muitto-muittašeapmi
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muitto-muittašeames, muitto-muittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: muitto-muittašeapmái

  Noun - muittuidmuittašeapmi: # AIGI PlGenCmp +  EAPMI
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: muittuidmuittašeapmi
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muittuidmuittašeames, muittuidmuittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: muittuidmuittašeapmái
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: muittuid-muittašeapmi
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muittuid-muittašeames, muittuid-muittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: muittuid-muittašeapmái

  Noun - muittašaneaiggát: # EAPMI SgCmp + GAHPIRLONG
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Nom: muittašaneaiggát
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Loc: muittašaneaiggádis
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Ill: muittašaneaiggádii
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: muittašaneaiggátlaš
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Nom: muittašan-eaiggát
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Loc: muittašan-eaiggádis
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Ill: muittašan-eaiggádii
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: muittašan-eaiggátlaš

  Noun - oarregávpi: # ALBMI SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-I
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Nom: oarregávpi
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Pl+Nom: oarregávppit
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Ill: oarregávpái
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oarregávppáš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oarregávppážaš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: oarregávppeheapme
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: oarregávppálaš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Nom: oarre-gávpi
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Pl+Nom: oarre-gávppit
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Ill: oarre-gávpái
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oarre-gávppáš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: oarre-gávppážaš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: oarre-gávppeheapme
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: oarre-gávppálaš


  Noun - orriidgávpi: # ALBMI PlGenCmp + GOAHTI-I
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Nom:  orriidgávpi
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Pl+Nom:  orriidgávppit
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Ill:  orriidgávpái
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: orriidgávppáš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: orriidgávppážaš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: orriidgávppeheapme
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: orriidgávppálaš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Nom: orriid-gávpi
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Pl+Nom: orriid-gávppit
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Ill: orriid-gávpái
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: orriid-gávppáš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: orriid-gávppážaš
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: orriid-gávppeheapme
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: orriid-gávppálaš

  Noun - juhkkisearvi: # ACTORTVder SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkisearvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkisearvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvveheapme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvválaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkki-searvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkki-searvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvveheapme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvválaš

  Noun - juhkkiidsearvi: # ACTORTVder PlGenCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkiidsearvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkiidsearvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvveheapme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvválaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkiid-searvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkiid-searvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvveheapme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvválaš

  Noun - agibeaiávssis: # FirstComponent + LASIS
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Nom: agibeaiávssis
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Pl+Nom: agibeaiáksát
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Ill: agibeaiáksái
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: agibeaiáksáš
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: agibeaiáksážaš
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: agibeaiávssesheapme
    agibeai+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Nom: agibeai-ávssis
    agibeai+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ávssis+N+Pl+Nom: agibeai-áksát
    agibeai+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Ill: agibeai-áksái
    agibeai+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: agibeai-áksáš
    agibeai+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: agibeai-áksážaš
    agibeai+N+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: agibeai-ávssesheapme



  Noun - kantuvradieđáhus: # KANTUR SgNomCmp + JOHTOLAT
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [konttordieđáhus, kontordieđáhus, gánttordieđáhus, gántordieđáhus, kontuvradieđáhus, kantuvradieđáhus, kánttordieđáhus, kánturdieđáhus, kántordieđáhus, gánturdieđáhus, gántuvradieđáhus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Loc: [konttordieđáhusas, kontordieđáhusas, gánttordieđáhusas, gántordieđáhusas, kontuvradieđáhusas, kantuvradieđáhusas, kánttordieđáhusas, kánturdieđáhusas, kántordieđáhusas, gánturdieđáhusas, gántuvradieđáhusas]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Ill: [konttordieđáhussii, kontordieđáhussii, gánttordieđáhussii, gántordieđáhussii, kontuvradieđáhussii, kantuvradieđáhussii, kánttordieđáhussii, kánturdieđáhussii, kántordieđáhussii, gánturdieđáhussii, gántuvradieđáhussii]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [konttor-dieđáhus, kontor-dieđáhus, gánttor-dieđáhus, gántor-dieđáhus, kontuvra-dieđáhus, kantuvra-dieđáhus, kánttor-dieđáhus, kántur-dieđáhus, kántor-dieđáhus, gántur-dieđáhus, gántuvra-dieđáhus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Loc: [konttor-dieđáhusas, kontor-dieđáhusas, gánttor-dieđáhusas, gántor-dieđáhusas, kontuvra-dieđáhusas, kantuvra-dieđáhusas, kánttor-dieđáhusas, kántur-dieđáhusas, kántor-dieđáhusas, gántur-dieđáhusas, gántuvra-dieđáhusas]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Ill: [konttor-dieđáhussii, kontor-dieđáhussii, gánttor-dieđáhussii, gántor-dieđáhussii, kontuvra-dieđáhussii, kantuvra-dieđáhussii, kánttor-dieđáhussii, kántur-dieđáhussii, kántor-dieđáhussii, gántur-dieđáhussii, gántuvra-dieđáhussii]
